Wyoming, session 2025, HB0193.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34-1-151(a)(vi) and by creating a new
paragraph (ix) and 34-1-152(b) are amended to read:

34-1-151. Property disclosure statement.

(a) Unless disclosure is waived as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, every seller of vacant land
shall provide to any prospective buyer a property
HB0193

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0574
disclosure statement that includes, but is not limited to,
the following information:

(vi) The availability of fire protection
services; and

(ix) If ownership interest in the pore space has
been severed.

34-1-152. Ownership of pore space underlying
surfaces.

(b) A conveyance of the surface ownership of real
property shall be a conveyance of the pore space in all
strata below the surface of such real property unless the
ownership interest in such pore space previously has been
severed from the surface ownership or is explicitly
excluded in the conveyance. All conveyances of the surface
ownership of real property shall include notice whether the
ownership interest in the pore space is or is not included
in the conveyance. The ownership of pore space in strata
may be conveyed in the manner provided by law for the
transfer of mineral interests in real property. No
HB0193

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0574
agreement conveying mineral or other interests underlying
the surface shall act to convey ownership of any pore space
in the stratum unless the agreement explicitly conveys that
ownership interest.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all conveyances of
real property on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0193